Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE J. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 750. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

Sec. 750.002. SPEED OF VEHICLE IN PARK IN COUNTY BORDERING GULF OF MEXICO. (a) A person commits an offense if the person drives a vehicle at a speed greater than 30 miles per hour within the boundaries of a county park located in a county that borders on the Gulf of Mexico, other than on a beach as that term is defined by Section 61.012, Natural Resources Code, in the park.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $1 or more than $200.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 750.003. OPERATION OF VEHICLE ON DUNE SEAWARD OF DUNE PROTECTION LINE PROHIBITED. (a) In this section, "vehicle" means a device that is designed to transport persons or property and is self-propelled or propelled by external means.

(b) A person commits an offense if the person operates a vehicle on a sand dune seaward of the dune protection line as defined in Section 63.012, Natural Resources Code, except on a roadway designated by a subdivision of the state.

(c) An offense under this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 176, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.